Wyoming, session 2025, SF0165.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 22-3-116 is amended to read:
22-3-116. Notice of intent to cancel registration.
When the county clerk has information that a registration
should be cancelled, he shall mail a notice of intent to
cancel to the elector at his address on the registry list
stating the reason for cancellation. In addition to mailing
the notice, the county clerk may also provide notice to the
elector by email. The notice shall state that cancellation
shall occur within twenty (20) days unless the elector asks
that his name remain on the registry list. A copy of the
notice of cancellation shall be retained by the county
clerk for three (3) years. A notice is not required if the
clerk has received a receipt of notification that the
elector has registered to vote in another jurisdiction or
if the elector requested cancellation in writing.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0165
ENROLLED ACT NO. 75, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2